tools/hyphenators/hyph_smn.dic
v1ö
1vå
v1åk
w1ak
w1aq
1wá
1wâ
2w1b
w1d
w2d2n2
w1é
w2g1r2
w2h
w1ho1
w2h1r
1wi
w1i1p
w1j
w1k
w2l
2w1n
2wol
w1p
2w1r2
w1s
w1š
2w1t2
w1to1
w1u1r
w2u1t
1wü
w1v
w2w
ww1e
w1w2h
w1x
w2y1
w1y2i
w1z
w1äh
w1äi
w1än1
wø1
w1ø2k
x1am
x2av
x1á
x1â
x1b
x1c
x2c1e
x1d
x2e1d
x2en
x2er
x1é
x1f
x1g
x1h
x2in
x1i1t
x1j
x1l
x1m2
x2ml1
x1n
x1o
x1p
x2p2h
x1q
x1r
x1s2
x2sl1
x1š
x2t2r
xt2w
x1þ
x2uz
x1ü
x1v
x1w
2x1x1
xx2i
x1y
2x1z
x1ä
x1ø
x1ö
x1å
1ya
y1a1l
yam2
2yá
y1á1g
2yâ
y1b
y2c
y1c2i
yc1r
y1ç
y2d2m
yd2ru
y2d1r
ye2a
2yeđ
ye2h1
y1e2n1m2
y1g
y2g2v2
y1h
y2i
2yij
yi2n
y1j
2yk
1y2l1l
y2lu
y1m2u
1yo
y1oc
yo2g
y2p1l
y1r
y2s1a
y2s2j
y2s2s1
y2su
y1š
1yt2r
y1t1y
y1þ
1yu
y2u1b
y1v
y1w
yx2
2yy
y1z
y1ä
y2ö1d
y1å
ý2r
ý1v
1za
1zá
zá2đ
zá2s
1zâ
1zb
2zc2
zd2
zf2
2z1g2
z2ha
z2hi
1zi
zi2l
z2j2
z1k2
zl2
zm2
2z1n
z1ov
z1p2
z1r2
z1s2
zš2
2z1t2
1zü
2z1v
z2w
z1ye
2z1z
1žá
1žâ
žd2
1že
žh2
žl2
žp2
žs2
žt2
žw2
2ž1ž
æ1c2
1æd
æ2d2s
æi1t
æj2
æ1l2
1æ1m2
æ1n
æ2n1u
æ2p2f2
æ2p2t2
æ2ro
ær2z
1æs
æ1s2a
æ2s2t
æ1s2ø
ä1ba
ä2b2h
ä1ç
2äd
ä1đ1u
ä1ep
äe1s
ä1g
ägu1
ä1h1u
ä1j
älâ1d
ä1lâ
ä1m
än1
änf2
ä2p2h
ä1ru
ä2su
ä1t
ät2t2v
ä2t1t
ät2y
ä1u
1äv1ŋ
äv2ru
äv1r
ä1vu
1äy
ä1z
ø1b
øc2
ø2d2m
1ø2f1
ø2g
ø1ie
øi1s2
øi1t
ø2k
2ø1lu
1øn
ø1p2
ø1q
ø1ru
ør2æ
øs2ki
ø2s1k
ø1š
1øt
øt2u
ø1t2ø
ø1u
1øw
1ø2y
ø1z
ö1b
1öc
1ö1d
1öi
2ök
ö1l2u
2öm2
ö2n2g
2öp
ö2p2h
ö2p2t2
ö2r2n
ö2ro
ör2z
ö1r2ö
ö1s2a
ö2s2j
ö2so
öš2
2ö1t
öu2
ö1v
1öy
1ö1z
å1am
å1b2
1åd
å1f
1åh
å2k2s
å1l
å2l2j2
åm2
å2n2n1
å1o
åor2
åpän2
å1pä
å1q
2å2r1d
1ås
å2st1
ås1ø
å1š
å1t1i
å1t1o
å2t1t2
2å1v
å1z
å1å
'a1q
'2b
'2h
's2
